src/morphology/stems/abbreviations.lexc
LEXICON ITRAB
Fr.p ab ;
H.M ab ;
IL ab ;
Kr.% f+MWE:Kr.% f ab ;
Lt ab ;
Prt ab-dot-noun ; ! Prioritering
Spd ab ;
a.l ab ;
adbl ab ;
akt ab ;
anestesiavd ab ;
d.% y+MWE:d.% y ab ;
d.å ab ;
dy ab ;
e.% lign+MWE:e.% lign ab ;
e.l ab ;
eftf ab ;
el.likn ab ;
ell.likn ab ;
et% al+MWE:et% al ab-dot ;
f.% v+MWE:f.% v ab ;
feb ab ;
g ab ;
ib ab ;
jap ab ;
km ab ;
kr.f ab ;
likn ab ;
m% o.h+MWE:m% o.h ab ;
m.% fl+MWE:m.% fl ab-dot ;
m.% p.% p+MWE:m.% p.% p ab ;
m.fl ab-dot ;
m.o.h ab-dot ;
m.p.p ab-dot ;
m.u.h ab-dot ;
m.v ab-dot ;
m/sek ab ;
mnd ab ;
moh ab ;
mu.h ab ;
mva ab ;
o.% fl+MWE:o.% fl ab ;
o.% lign+MWE:o.% lign ab ;
o.% s.% fr+MWE:o.% s.% fr ab ;
o.h ab ;
o.likn ab ;
op.% cit+MWE:op.% cit ab ;
ovfr ab ;
p.% m+MWE:p.% m ab ;
p.% t+MWE:p.% t ab ;
p.p.m ab ;
pers ab-dot ; ! pers. vara må til pers. :-( a.
q.% e.% d+MWE:q.% e.% d ab ;
red ab ;
res.kap ab ;
s.å ab ;
sep ab ;
sst ab ;
tel ab ;
u.% å+MWE:u.% å ab ;
årh ab ;
LEXICON TRNUMAB
distr ab-dot-noun ;
Arkivsaksnr ab-dot-noun ;
arkivsaksnr ab-dot-noun ;
Arkivsaknr ab-dot-noun ;
arkivsaknr ab-dot-noun ;
Apd		ab-dot ;                        
Bnr		ab-dot-noun ;                   
Gnr		ab-noun ;                       
ILO-konv.% nr+MWE:ILO-konv.% nr ab-dot ;
ILOkonv.% nr+MWE:ILOkonv.% nr ab-dot ;
Jak ab-dot-noun ;
Kommunenr	ab-dot-noun ;
O.nr		ab-noun ;                   
Pb              ab-noun ; ! Postbox
Postnr		ab-dot-noun ;
Rt		ab-dot ;                        
Rv ab ;
S.nr		ab-noun ;                   
St.% meld.% nr+MWE:St.% meld.% nr ab-dot ;
St.% meld+MWE:St.% meld ab-dot ;
St.meld ab-dot ;
St.meld.% nr+MWE:St.meld.% nr ab-dot ;
St.meld.nr ab-dot ;
a.D ab-dot ;
alm		ab-dot ;                        
avd		ab-noun ;                       
avsn ab ;
b.c		ab-dot ;  !b.c. 18-22
bnr		ab-noun ;                       
fnr		ab-noun ;
gnr		ab-dot-noun ;                   
j		ab-dot ;                        
jnr		ab-dot ;                        
kap		ab-dot-noun ;                   
lnr ab ;
mob		ab-noun ;
nkr ab ;
nr		ab-noun ; ! Nr nicht            
p.b ab ;
pst ab ;
s		ab-noun ;                       
st.% meld.% nr+MWE:st.% meld.% nr ab-dot ;
st.meld ab-dot ;
st.meld.nr ab-dot ;
tab	ab ; ! or: Add capital Tab.         
tlf		ab-dot-noun ;                   
vnr		ab-dot-noun ;                   
LEXICON TRAB
B ab ;
Budsjett-innst.% S+MWE:Budsjett-innst.% S ab ;
Cand.% Med.% Vet+MWE:Cand.% Med.% Vet ab-dot ;
Cand.% Oecon+MWE:Cand.% Oecon ab-dot ;
Cand.% Pharm+MWE:Cand.% Pharm ab-dot ;
Cand.% Polit+MWE:Cand.% Polit+MWE ab-dot ;
Cand.% Real+MWE:Cand.% Real ab-dot ;
Cand.Med.Vet ab-dot ;
Cand.Oecon ab-dot ;
Cand.Pharm ab-dot ;
Cand.Psychol ab-dot ;
Cand.Scient ab-dot ;
Co ab ;
Dr.% Jur+MWE:Dr.% Jur ab-dot ;
Dr.% Odont+MWE:Dr.% Odont ab-dot ;
Dr.% Philos+MWE:Dr.% Philos ab-dot ;
Dr.% Psychol+MWE:Dr.% Psychol ab-dot ;
Dr.Art ab-dot ;
Dr.Med.Vet ab-dot ;
Dr.Oecon ab-dot ;
Dr.Polit ab-dot ;
Dr.Scient ab-dot ;
Ev.luth ab ;
H.% K.% H+MWE:H.% K.% H ab ;
HMS ab ;
Innst ab ;
Innst.% S.% nr+MWE:Innst.% S.% nr ab ;
Joh ab ;
L ab ;
Mag.Art ab-dot ;
Mrs ab-dot ;
NB ab ;
Ot ab ;
Ot.% prop.% nr+MWE:Ot.% prop.% nr ab ;
Ot.prop.nr ab ;
Q ab ;
Sp ab ;
St.tid ab ;
Stud.% Art+MWE:Stud.% Art ab-dot ;
Stud.% Med.% Vet+MWE:Stud.% Med.% Vet ab-dot ;
Stud.% Oecon+MWE:Stud.% Oecon ab-dot ;
Stud.% Polit+MWE:Stud.% Polit ab-dot ;
Stud.% Scient+MWE:Stud.% Scient ab-dot ;
Stud.Jur ab-dot ;
Stud.Odont ab-dot ;
Stud.Philos ab-dot ;
Stud.Psychol ab-dot ;
X ab ;
adm.% direktør+MWE:adm.% direktør ab-nodot ;
adm.direktør ab-nodot ;
alm ab ;
arb ab-dot ;
ass.% gen.% sekr+MWE:ass.% gen.% sekr ab ;
avs ab ;
bl ab-dot ;
bl.a ab-dot ;
ca ab ;
can.% med.% vet+MWE:can.% med.% vet ab-dot ;
cand ab-dot ;
cand.% act+MWE:cand.% act ab-dot ;
cand.% jur+MWE:cand.% jur ab-dot ;
cand.% med.% vet+MWE:cand.% med.% vet ab-dot ;
cand.% odont+MWE:cand.% odont ab-dot ;
cand.% paed+MWE:cand.% paed ab-dot ;
cand.% philol+MWE:cand.% philol ab-dot ;
cand.% psychol+MWE:cand.% psychol ab-dot ;
cand.% scient+MWE:cand.% scient ab-dot ;
cand.% theol+MWE:cand.% theol ab-dot ;
cand.agric ab-dot ;
cand.mag ab-dot ;
cand.med.vet ab-dot ;
cand.odont ab-dot ;
cand.paed ab-dot ;
cand.philol ab-dot ;
cand.psychol ab-dot ;
cand.scient ab-dot ;
cand.theol ab-dot ;
d.c ab ;
dim ab ;
dr.% agric+MWE:dr.% agric ab-dot ;
dr.% ing+MWE:dr.% ing ab-dot ;
dr.% med+MWE:dr.% med ab-dot ;
dr.% odont+MWE:dr.% odont ab-dot ;
dr.% pharm+MWE:dr.% pharm ab-dot ;
dr.% polit+MWE:dr.% polit ab-dot ;
dr.% scient+MWE:dr.% scient ab-dot ;
dr.% theol+MWE:dr.% theol ab-dot ;
dr.art ab-dot ;
dr.jur ab-dot ;
dr.med.vet ab-dot ;
dr.oecon ab-dot ;
dr.philos ab-dot ;
dr.psychol ab-dot ;
dr.techn ab-dot ;
e ab ;
evt ab ;
ex ab-noun ;
ex.fac ab-noun ;
f.% o.% m+MWE:f.% o.% m ab-dot ;
f.h ab ;
fac ab-dot-noun ;
fi ab ;
fork ab ;
forr ab-dot ;
genr ab ;
grl ab ;
holl ab ;
ihht ab-dot ;
imperf ab ;
intr ab ;
jvf ab ;
kl ab ;
l ab ;
lør ab ;
m.o.t ab ;
mag.% art+MWE:mag.% art ab-dot ;
mag.art ab-dot ;
meld ab-dot ;
mr ab ;
ndfr ab ;
oblt ab ;
ons ab ;
ovf ab ;
phil ab-dot-noun ;
pkt ab ;
pr.pr ab ;
refl ab ;
res.% kap+MWE:res.% kap ab-dot ;
rt ab-dot ;
s.a ab ;
sen ab ;
smh ab ;
strl ab ;
stud.% agric+MWE:stud.% agric ab-dot ;
stud.% ing+MWE:stud.% ing ab-dot ;
stud.% med+MWE:stud.% med ab-dot ;
stud.% odont+MWE:stud.% odont ab-dot ;
stud.% pharm+MWE:stud.% pharm ab-dot ;
stud.% polit+MWE:stud.% polit ab-dot ;
stud.% scient+MWE:stud.% scient ab-dot ;
stud.% theol+MWE:stud.% theol ab-dot ;
stud.art ab-dot ;
stud.jur ab-dot ;
stud.med.vet ab-dot ;
stud.oecon ab-dot ;
stud.philos ab-dot ;
stud.psychol ab-dot ;
stud.techn ab-dot ;
t ab ;
t.h ab ;
theol ab-dot ;
tir ab ;
u.s ab ;
utt ab ;
vedk ab ;
viseadm.direktør ab-nodot ;
Á ab ;
Š ab ;
kr ab ; 
